Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Subpart 2 Applicability of Article

11-9-109.
Scope.

General scope of article.Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section, this article applies to:

A transaction, regardless of its form, that creates a security interest in personal property or fixtures by contract;

An agricultural lien;

A sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes;

A consignment;

A security interest arising under Code Section 11-2-401, Code Section 11-2-505, subsection (3) of Code Section 11-2-711, or subsection (5) of Code Section 11-2A-508, as provided in Code Section 11-9-110; and

A security interest arising under Code Section 11-4-210 or 11-5-118.

Security interest in secured obligation.The application of this article to a security interest in a secured obligation is not affected by the fact that the obligation is itself secured by a transaction or interest to which this article does not apply.

Extent to which article does not apply.This article does not apply to the extent that:

A statute, regulation, or treaty of the United States preempts this article;

Another statute of this state expressly governs the creation, perfection, or priority;

A statute of another state, a foreign country, or a governmental unit of another state or a foreign country, other than a statute generally applicable to security interests, expressly governs creation, perfection, priority, or enforcement of a security interest created by the state, country, or governmental unit; or

The rights of a transferee beneficiary or nominated person under a letter of credit are independent and superior under Code Section 11-5-114.

Inapplicability of article.This article does not apply to:

A landlord’s lien, other than an agricultural lien;

A lien, other than an agricultural lien, given by statute or other rule of law for services or materials, but Code Section 11-9-333 applies with respect to priority of the lien;

An assignment of a claim for wages, salary, or other compensation of an employee;

A sale of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes as part of a sale of the business out of which they arose;

An assignment of accounts, chattel paper, payment intangibles, or promissory notes which is for the purpose of collection only;

An assignment of a right to payment under a contract to an assignee that is also obligated to perform under the contract;

An assignment of a single account, payment intangible, or promissory note to an assignee in full or partial satisfaction of a preexisting indebtedness;

A transfer of an interest in or an assignment of a claim under a policy of insurance, other than an assignment by or to a health care provider of a health care insurance receivable and any subsequent assignment of the right to payment, but Code Sections 11-9-315 and 11-9-322 apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds;

An assignment of a right represented by a judgment, other than a judgment taken on a right to payment that was collateral;

A right of recoupment or setoff, but:

Code Section 11-9-340 applies with respect to the effectiveness of rights of recoupment or setoff against deposit accounts; and

Code Section 11-9-404 applies with respect to defenses or claims of an account debtor;

The creation or transfer of an interest in or lien on real property, including a lease or usufruct or rents thereunder, except to the extent that provision is made for:

Liens on real property in Code Sections 11-9-203 and 11-9-308;

Fixtures in Code Section 11-9-334;

Fixture filings in Code Sections 11-9-501, 11-9-502, 11-9-512, 11-9-516, and 11-9-519; and

Security agreements covering personal and real property in Code Section 11-9-604;

An assignment of a claim arising in tort, other than a commercial tort claim, but Code Sections 11-9-315 and 11-9-322 apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds;

An assignment of a deposit account in a consumer transaction, but Code Sections 11-9-315 and 11-9-322 apply with respect to proceeds and priorities in proceeds;

An assignment of a lottery prize payable by this state or any instrumentality of this state;

An assignment of a claim or right to receive payment as described in and to the extent limited by the provisions of Code Section 34-9-84 or by Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 51; or

A security interest created by or affecting property of this state or any governmental unit of this state in any public finance transaction, other than a security interest created by:

An authority activated under Chapter 62 of Title 36, the “Development Authorities Law”; or

A local authority having as its principal function the stimulation of industrial growth and the reduction of unemployment.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-109, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

Article 9 applied to transaction. —

See Trust Co. Bank v. Walker, 35 Bankr. 237 (Bankr. N.D. Ga. 1983).

11-9-110.
Security interests arising under Article 2 or 2A of this title.

A security interest arising under Code Section 11-2-401 or 11-2-505, subsection (3) of Code Section 11-2-711, or subsection (5) of Code Section 11-2A-508 is subject to this article. However, until the debtor obtains possession of the goods:

The security interest is enforceable, even if paragraph (3) of subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-203 has not been satisfied;

Filing is not required to perfect the security interest;

The rights of the secured party after default by the debtor are governed by Article 2 or 2A of this title; and

The security interest has priority over a conflicting security interest created by the debtor.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-110, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-111.
Applicability of bulk transfer laws.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3D-2/SB 65, effective July 1, 2015.